District of Columbia statutes.
38-2401.11

Authority.

For the purpose of providing a residential facility for postsecondary technical training and education for individuals who are deaf in order to prepare them for successful employment, the institution of higher education with which the Secretary has an agreement under this part is authorized to operate and maintain a National Technical Institute for the Deaf.

History

Aug. 4, 1986, 100 Stat. 781, Pub. L. 99-371, § 201
renumbered as § 111, Oct. 16, 1992, 106 Stat. 2151, Pub. L. 102-421, § 101(b)(4)
Aug. 11, 1993, 107 Stat. 733, Pub. L. 103-73, § 203(f)

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 31-1841.4a.